Connecticut, session 2026, SB00357.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 31-234 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2028):
3 Each individual who is eligible to receive benefits for unemployment
4 with respect to any week shall be paid with respect to such week a
5 dependency allowance of [fifteen] forty-five dollars for such
6 individual's nonworking spouse, as defined by regulation, living in the
7 same household with such individual and for each of such individual's
8 children or stepchildren who at the beginning of the individual's current
9 benefit year were being wholly or mainly supported by such individual
10 and were under eighteen years of age or under twenty-one years of age
11 and in full-time attendance in a secondary school, a technical school, a
12 college, or state accredited job training program, or who at the
13 beginning of the individual's benefit year were mentally or physically
14 handicapped and because of such handicap were being wholly or
SB357 / File No. 464 1

SB357 File No. 464
15 mainly supported by such individual, but in no event shall such
16 allowances exceed the number of whole dollars in one hundred per cent
17 of the total unemployment benefit rate of such individual or be paid
18 with respect to more than five dependents. If the individual acquires
19 any additional dependents in the course of a benefit year, the
20 dependency allowance shall be adjusted accordingly during the next
21 following complete calendar week. Dependency allowances shall be in
22 addition to the unemployment benefits otherwise payable and shall not
23 be considered part of an individual's total unemployment benefit rate
24 and no dependency allowance shall be payable with respect to any week
25 unless an unemployment benefit is also payable with respect to such
26 week. If both spouses receive benefits with respect to a week of
27 unemployment, neither shall be entitled to a dependency allowance
28 with respect to the other and only one of them shall be entitled to a
29 dependency allowance with respect to any child or stepchild.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2028 31-234
LAB Joint Favorable
SB357 / File No. 464 2

SB357 File No. 464
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. GF - Cost None 380,000
Labor Dept. UITF - Cost None None
Note: UITF=Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund; GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill increases the dependency allowance for individuals eligible
to receive unemployment benefits from $15 to $45, starting on July 1,
2028. This results in a one-time cost to the Department of Labor (DOL)
of $380,000 in FY 281 for technology changes to ReEmployCT2.
The Out Years
In addition to the one-time cost identified above, the bill results in an
annual cost to the Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund (UITF) of
approximately $10.8 million, starting in FY 29.
According to the DOL, an average of $5.4 million was paid for
dependency allowances over the past three fiscal years. The estimated
amounts may fluctuate depending on economic conditions (e.g.
unemployment levels).
1 The cost would be incurred in FY 28 to ensure the system is operational prior to the
beginning of FY 29.
2 DOL's unemployment tax and benefits system.
SB357 / File No. 464 3

SB357 File No. 464
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 357
AN ACT CONCERNING UNEMPLOYMENT DEPENDENCY
ALLOWANCE.